Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201269-1329
Act, how cited.

Sections 69-1301 to 69-1329 shall be known and may be cited
as the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act.

Laws 1969, c. 611, § 29, p. 2490;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 26, § 21;

Laws 1994, LB 1048, § 9;

Laws 2003, LB 424, § 5;

Laws 2006, LB 173, § 5;

Laws 2006, LB 771, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB819, § 4.
July 19, 2012